New York, session 2025-2026, S3717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding a new section 195.03 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 195.03 Official interference with transportation. 4 A public servant is guilty of official interference with transporta- 5 tion when, with intent to impede, hamper, stall or otherwise interfere 6 with the ordinary progress of any form of transportation on, in or 7 through the roadways, highways, bridges, railways, waterways or airways 8 of the state, such public servant: 9 1. commits an act constituting an unauthorized exercise of such public 10 servant's official functions, knowing that such act is unauthorized; or 11 2. knowingly refrains from performing an official duty imposed upon 12 such public servant, or is clearly inherent in the nature of their 13 public office. 14 Official interference with transportation is a class E felony. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07402-01-5